Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Article 3. Division

Cross references. —

As to joint operation and cooperation between districts and the board of district managers, see §§

41-6-101

through

41-6-105

,

41-6-120

through

41-6-127

.

As to bonds held by state, see §§

41-6-201

through

41-6-209

.

As to determination of rights of joint users or claimants, see §§

41-6-301

through

41-6-308

.

As to contesting organization or assessments, and as to limitation of actions, see §§

41-6-401

and

41-6-402

.

As to taxes and assessments, and as to enforcement of liens, see §§

41-6-501

through

41-6-507

.

§ 41-9-301.
Authorized.

Any drainage district now or hereafter organized under the provisions of chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920 and acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto, may be divided into two (2) or more districts in the manner provided in this chapter.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 122-911; C.S. 1945, § 71-1601; W.S. 1957, § 41-461.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

§ 41-9-302.
Contents of petition.

Whenever a majority of the adult owners of lands within any portion of an organized drainage district, who shall represent more than one-half in area of the lands within said portion which it is proposed shall be cut off and divided from the drainage district as organized, desire to effect such division, they may file in the district court of the county having jurisdiction over the original district, a petition setting forth:

The proposed name of the new drainage district to be formed by such division;

The necessity of the proposed work, if any, and the necessity and reasons for division, describing the same;

A general description of the proposed starting points, routes and termini of the proposed drains, ditches and laterals;

A general description of the lands proposed to be included in said district;

The names of the owners of all lands in said proposed district, when known;

The names of the owners of all other lands in the district proposed to be divided, when known;

A detailed statement of the existing indebtedness of the original drainage district and the proposed apportionment of said indebtedness as between the remaining portion of the original district and the proposed new district based upon the assessments for benefits against the lands contained therein, as last confirmed by the court.

If the purpose of said petition, in addition to a division of the district, is the enlargement, repair and maintenance of a ditch, or other work heretofore constructed under any law of the state, said petition shall give the general description of the same, with such particulars as may be deemed important.

Said petition shall pray for the organization of a drainage district by name, and with the boundaries proposed, and for the appointment of commissioners for the execution of any proposed work according to the general provisions of chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, as amended.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 2; R.S. 1931, § 122-912; C.S. 1945, § 71-1602; W.S. 1957, § 41-462.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

§ 41-9-303.
Order for hearing on petition; notice generally.

On such petition being filed, the court or judge thereof shall make an order fixing the time and place for a hearing thereon, and ordering notice; thereupon the clerk of said court shall cause twenty (20) days notice of the filing of said petition to be given:

By posting notice thereof in at least five (5) public places in said proposed new district, and in at least five (5) public places in the remainder of the district proposed to be divided;

By serving or causing to be served a copy of such notice on each owner of land within said district, proposed to be divided, either personally or by registered mail to his last known address at least twenty (20) days prior to the hearing; and by serving in like manner a similar notice on each of the commissioners of the drainage district proposed to be divided; and

By publishing a notice thereof at least once a week for three (3) successive weeks in some newspaper published in the county in which any part of the district is located. If there be no newspaper in any such county, such notice shall be published in a newspaper published in the adjoining county nearest the land in said district.

Such notice shall state:

In what court said petition is filed;

A brief description of any proposed new work, with the starting points, routes and termini of new drains and ditches;

The boundaries of the proposed district;

The name proposed for such district;

The proposed apportionment of the existing indebtedness as between the remaining portion of the original district and said proposed new district;

The time and place as fixed by the court for the hearing on said petition.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 3; R.S. 1931, § 122-913; C.S. 1945, § 71-1603; W.S. 1957, § 41-463.

§ 41-9-304.
Manner of service.

Service of said notice, and proof of service thereof, shall be made in the same manner as is now provided by law in the case of the organization of new districts under chapter 76, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, as amended.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 4; R.S. 1931, § 122-914; C.S. 1945, § 71-1604; W.S. 1957, § 41-464.

Disposition of ch. 76, C.S. 1920. —

See Editor's note to §

41-9-241

.

§ 41-9-305.
Hearing.

Upon the day fixed for the hearing on such petition, all parties owning lands, or any interest or easement in land, within said district, proposed to be divided, or whomsoever would be affected thereby, or the commissioners of the original district, may appear and contest the granting of said petition on the grounds that said proposed division will not serve the best interests of all parties interested, and the grounds specified in W.S.

41-9-111

.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 5; R.S. 1931, § 122-915; C.S. 1945, § 71-1605; W.S. 1957, § 41-465.

§ 41-9-306.
Court order; creation of new district as corporate entity; apportionment of indebtedness; proration of maintenance expenses of existing works in both districts.

If it shall appear to the court upon said hearing that the requisite number of signers appear on said petition, as required herein; that due and proper service has been had upon all parties interested as herein provided; and that the best interests of all parties interested will be served by the proposed division, he shall so find, and enter an order creating said new district, appointing commissioners therefor, apportioning the indebtedness of the original district as between the remaining portion of the original district and the proposed new district organized therefrom based upon the assessments for benefits last confirmed by the court against the lands embraced in each, and determining the proportionate amount, if any, of the annual operation and maintenance expense the new district shall bear of and for maintaining the drainage system constructed by the original district, and thereupon such new drainage district shall be, and thereby declared to be organized as an independent drainage district by the name fixed by court, with the boundaries as therein fixed, and with the indebtedness as apportioned to it, to be a body corporate, with the right to sue and be sued, adopt a corporate seal, and have perpetual succession the same as if organized as an original drainage district under the statute in such case provided; provided, however, that no such order shall be effective for the apportionment of indebtedness as herein provided unless and until the owners and holders of the evidences of indebtedness against the original district, whether bonds or otherwise, shall have filed in said court a written consent and approval of the apportionment thereof, as made by the court.

History.

Laws 1927, ch. 56, § 6; R.S. 1931, § 122-916; C.S. 1945, § 71-1606; W.S. 1957, § 41-466.